Utah statutes.
62A-15-626.   Release from commitment.
(1)  A local mental health authority or its designee shall release from
commitment any person who, in the opinion of the local mental health authority
or its designee, has recovered or no longer meets the criteria specified in
Section 62A-15-631.
(2)  A local mental health authority or its designee may release from
commitment any patient whose commitment is determined to be no longer
advisable except as provided by Section 78A-6-120, but an effort shall be made
to assure that any further supportive services required to meet the patient's
needs upon release will be provided.
(3)  When a patient has been committed to a local mental health authority by
judicial process, the local mental health authority shall follow the
procedures described in Sections  62A-15-636 and  62A-15-637.
